fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON ýôtin-
ýôtin-/:ýôtin/ -pahtâ "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
ýôtin-/:ýôtin/ -paýi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/18 [1/145429]
ýôtin-/:ýôtin/ -paýin "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
ýôtin-/:ýôtin/ -pêst- "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
ýôtin-/:ýôtin/ -pêstan "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/18 [1/145429]
ýôtin-/:ýôtin/ -si- "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
ýôtin-/:ýôtin/ DIM "weight: 26.564391" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
@R.class.II@ýôtin-+Der/V:@R.class.II@ýôtin VII-n-SG "weight: 15.842216" ; ! n=11/18 (VII-1n) [45/145429]

LEXICON ýôtinw-
ýôtinw-+Der/N:ýôtinw NA "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=1/3 (NA-3) [9/145429]
ýôtinw-+Der/N:ýôtinw NI "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/3 (NI-3) [2/145429]

LEXICON ńow-
ńow-/:ńow/ -tin "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON ńâhk-
ńâhk-/:ńâhk/ -âst- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
ńâhk-/:ńâhk/ -âstim "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]

LEXICON ńôtin-
@R.class.II@ńôtin-+Der/V:@R.class.II@ńôtin VII-n-SG "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (VII-1n) [0/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 ýôtin- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=8/27654 [33/145429]
0 ýôtinw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [10/145429]
0 ńow- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 ńâhk- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 ńôtin- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
